Vermont, session 2025-2026, S246.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 9741 is amended to read:
§ 9741. SALES NOT COVERED
Retail sales and use of the following shall be exempt from the tax on retail
sales imposed under section 9771 of this title and the use tax imposed under
section 9773 of this title:
* * *
VT LEG #385508 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.246
2026 Page 2 of 3
(29)(A) Aircraft, but not drones, sold to a person that holds itself out to
the general public as engaging in air commerce, for use primarily in the
carriage of persons or property for compensation or hire; and
(B) parts, machinery, and equipment to be installed in any aircraft,
other than drones.
* * *
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 3622 is added to read:
§ 3622. AIRCRAFT
Aircraft, as defined in 5 V.S.A. § 202(6), shall be valued and taxed in
accordance with this chapter, except that aircraft that is not used primarily for
commercial operations involving the transport of passengers or freight shall be
exempt from property taxation.
Sec. 3. REPORT; REVENUE SHARING WITH AIRPORTS
(a) The Commissioner of Taxes, in consultation with the Agency of
Transportation, shall study the feasibility of sharing revenue generated through
air commerce with Vermont airports.
(b) The report shall include:
(1) the Department’s capacity to identify and share sales and use tax
revenue related to transactions originating from airports and air commerce;
VT LEG #385508 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.246
2026 Page 3 of 3
(2) the Department’s capacity to identify and share property tax revenue
generated from the real and personal property of airports and businesses
operating at airports;
(3) the State’s ability to create and administer dedicated funds for
specific airports, to be funded through revenue sharing;
(4) estimates of sales and use and property tax revenue currently
generated through airports; and
(5) the State of Vermont’s compliance with 49 U.S.C. § 47133.
(c) On or before December 15, 2026, the Commissioner of Taxes shall
submit a study report detailing the Commissioner’s findings under this section
to the House Committees on Transportation and on Ways and Means and the
Senate Committees on Transportation and on Finance.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385508 v.1